Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2241
Affected swine herd, defined.

Affected swine herd shall mean a swine herd in which swine have been determined by the results of an official test to be infected with or diagnosed by a veterinarian as having pseudorabies.

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 6.